Utah statutes.
17C-4-105.   Community development plan to be adopted by community legislative body.

(1)  A community development project area plan approved by board resolution under Section 17C-4-104 may not take effect until it has been adopted by ordinance of the legislative body of the community that created the agency and notice under Section 17C-4-106 is provided.

(2)  Each ordinance under Subsection (1) shall:

(a)  be adopted by the community legislative body after the board's approval of a resolution under Section 17C-4-104; and

(b)  designate the approved project area plan as the official community development plan of the project area.

